Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 3. Right to Farm.

§ 3.2-300.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Agricultural operation” means any operation devoted to the bona fide production of crops, or animals, or fowl including the production of fruits and vegetables of all kinds; meat, dairy, and poultry products; nuts, tobacco, nursery, and floral products; and the production and harvest of products from silviculture activity. It shall also include the housing of livestock, as defined in §

3.2-6500

.

“Production agriculture and silviculture” means the bona fide production or harvesting of agricultural or silvicultural products but shall not include the processing of agricultural or silvicultural products or the above ground application or storage of sewage sludge.

History.

1981, c. 384, §§ 3.1-22.28, 3.1-22.29; 1991, c. 293; 1994, c. 779; 2007, c. 444; 2008, c. 860; 2022, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to restrictions on local regulation of certain agricultural operations, see §

15.2-2288.6

.

As to manner of installing underground utility lines through agricultural operation, see § 56-257.5.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 487, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declarative of existing law.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 487 added the last sentence in the definition of “Agricultural operation.”

Research References.

Agricultural Law (Matthew Bender). Harl.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Agricultural operation.” —

Aquaculture not an agricultural operation under the Virginia Right to Farm Act. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Brenda L. Pogge, Member, House of Delegates, 11-127, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (3/9/12).

§ 3.2-301.
Right to farm; restrictive ordinances.

In order to limit the circumstances under which agricultural operations may be deemed to be a nuisance, especially when nonagricultural land uses are initiated near existing agricultural operations, no locality shall adopt any ordinance that requires that a special exception or special use permit be obtained for any production agriculture or silviculture activity in an area that is zoned as an agricultural district or classification. Localities may adopt setback requirements, minimum area requirements, and other requirements that apply to land on which agriculture and silviculture activity is occurring within the locality that is zoned as an agricultural district or classification. No locality shall enact zoning ordinances that would unreasonably restrict or regulate farm structures or farming and forestry practices in an agricultural district or classification unless such restrictions bear a relationship to the health, safety, and general welfare of its citizens. This section shall become effective on April 1, 1995, and from and after that date all land zoned to an agricultural district or classification shall be in conformity with this section.

History.

1981, c. 384, § 3.1-22.28; 1991, c. 293; 1994, c. 779; 2007, c. 444; 2008, c. 860; 2014, c. 246.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 356, cl. 4 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to limit or impact §

3.2-301

or

15.2-2288.6

of the Code of Virginia.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 246 substituted “locality” for “county” in the first sentence and substituted “Localities” for “Counties” at the beginning of the second sentence.

Law Review.

For Essay, “The Grapes of Wrath: Encouraging Fruitful Collaborations Between Local Governments and Farm Wineries in the Commonwealth,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 235 (2013).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Agricultural operation.” —

Aquaculture not an agricultural operation under the Virginia Right to Farm Act. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Brenda L. Pogge, Member, House of Delegates, 11-127, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (3/9/12).

Authorizing agricultural uses in a rural residential zoning district does not create a zoning classification. —

Allowing agriculture “by right” in areas zoned “Rural Residential” does not constitute a zoning classification as used in §

3.2-301

. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Brenda L. Pogge, Member, House of Delegates, 11-132, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 41 (6/21/13).

§ 3.2-302.
When agricultural operations do not constitute nuisance.

No agricultural operation or any of its appurtenances shall be or become a nuisance, private or public, if such operations are conducted in substantial compliance with any applicable best management practices in use by the operation at the time of the alleged nuisance and with any applicable laws and regulations of the Commonwealth relevant to the alleged nuisance. No action shall be brought by any person against any agricultural operation the existence of which was known or reasonably knowable when that person’s use or occupancy of his property began.The provisions of this section shall apply to any nuisance claim brought against any party that has a business relationship with the agricultural operation that is the subject of the alleged nuisance. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any action for negligence or any tort other than a nuisance.For the purposes of this subsection, “substantial compliance” means a level of compliance with applicable best management practices, laws, or regulations such that any identified deficiency did not cause a nuisance that created a significant risk to human health or safety. Agricultural operations shall be presumed to be in substantial compliance absent a contrary showing.

The provisions of subsection A shall not affect or defeat the right of any person to recover damages for any injuries or damages sustained by them on account of any pollution of, or change in condition of, the waters of any stream or on the account of any overflow of lands of any such person.

Only persons with an ownership interest in the property allegedly affected by the nuisance may bring an action for private nuisance. Any compensatory damages awarded to any person for a private nuisance action not otherwise prohibited by this section, where the alleged nuisance emanated from an agricultural operation, shall be measured as follows:

For a permanent nuisance, by the reduction in fair market value of the person’s property caused by the nuisance, but not to exceed the fair market value of the property; or

For a temporary nuisance, by the diminution of the fair rental value of the person’s property.The combined recovery from multiple actions for private nuisance brought against any agricultural operation by any person or that person’s successor in interest shall not exceed the fair market value of the subject property, regardless of whether any subsequent action is brought against a different defendant than any preceding action.

Notwithstanding subsection C, for any nuisance claim not otherwise prohibited by this section, nothing herein shall limit any recovery allowed under common law for physical or mental injuries that arise from such alleged nuisance and are shown by objective and documented medical evidence to have endangered life or health.

Any and all ordinances of any unit of local government now in effect or hereafter adopted that would make the operation of any such agricultural operation or its appurtenances a nuisance or providing for abatement thereof as a nuisance in the circumstance set forth in this section are and shall be null and void.

History.

1981, c. 384, § 3.1-22.29; 1994, c. 779; 2008, c. 860; 2018, cc. 147, 677.

Cross references.

As to exemptions from applicability of Housing Authorities Law to farm structures, see §

36-9.1

.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 147 and 677 are identical, and rewrote subsection A, added subsections C and D, redesignated former subsection C as E; and in subsection E, deleted the former second sentence, which read, “The provisions of this section shall not apply whenever a nuisance results from the negligent or improper operation of any such agricultural operation or any of its appurtenances.”